California statutes. Public Contract Code
The Legislature has found that electronic data-processing equipment, goods, and services are unique, and of such importance to state programs as to warrant a separate acquisition authority therefor. The Legislature finds that the Southern California Rapid Transit District has needs similar to the state with respect to acquisition of electronic data-processing goods and services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22102.

For purposes of this chapter, “district” means the Southern California Rapid Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22103.

(a) Acquisition of electronic data-processing goods and services by the district shall be conducted through competitive means, except when the district determines one of the following:

(1) The goods and services proposed for acquisition are the only goods and services which can meet the district’s needs.

(2) The goods and services are needed in case of an emergency where immediate acquisition is necessary for the efficient operation and preservation of the district’s services.

(b) The mode of acquisition to be used and the procedure to be followed shall be approved by the district which shall adopt appropriate criteria and procedures to ensure compliance with the intent of this chapter. However, the procedure shall provide for issuance by the district of a solicitation document to, and for the submission of proposals by, prospective contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22104.

(a) Contract awards shall be based on the proposal which provides the most cost-effective solution to the district’s requirements, as determined by the evaluation criteria contained in the solicitation document. The evaluation procedures may provide for the selection of a vendor on a basis other than cost alone.

(b) Evaluation of proposals for the purpose of determining contract award shall provide for consideration of a proposer’s best financing alternative unless the district determines that a particular financing alternative should not be considered.

(c) A vendor may be excluded from proposal processes, if the vendor’s performance with respect to a previously awarded contract has been determined unsatisfactory by the district, provided that the exclusion shall not exceed one year for any one determination of unsatisfactory performance and provided further that any excluded vendor may at any time during the exclusion be reinstated upon demonstration to the district’s satisfaction that the problems which resulted in his or her exclusion have been corrected.

(d) To the extent practical, the solicitation documents shall provide for a contract to be written to enable acquisition of additional items to avoid essentially redundant acquisition processes when it can be determined that it is economical to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22105.

Protest procedures shall be provided to allow proposers an opportunity to formally protest any acquisition conducted in accordance with this chapter. Authority to protest may be limited to participating proposers. The procuring officer of the district, or the person designated by the procuring officer, is authorized to consider and decide on initial protests. A decision regarding an initial protest shall be final. If, prior to making an award, any proposer who submitted an offer files a protest with the district against awarding the contract or purchase order on the ground that his or her bid or proposal should have been selected in accordance with the selection criteria in the selection document, the contract or purchase order shall not be awarded until either the protest has been withdrawn or the district has made a final decision as to the action to be taken on the protest. A protestor, within 10 calendar days of filing a protest, shall file with the district a full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts in support thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22106.

Electronic data-processing goods which are determined to be surplus to the district’s needs shall be disposed of in a manner best serving the interests of the district, which may include auction, sale, or transfer to other governmental entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22107.

The district may establish policies and procedures for all of the following:

(a) Price negotiation with respect to all acquisitions conducted under this chapter.

(b) System or equipment component performance or availability standards, including an assessment of the added cost to the district to receive contractual guarantee of a level of performance.

(c) Requirement of a bond or assessment of a cost penalty with respect to a contract or consideration of a contract offered by a vendor whose performance has been determined unsatisfactory by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22108.

The district may adopt additional rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22109.

Any contract for electronic data-processing goods and services, to be manufactured or performed by the contractor especially for the district and not suitable for sale to others in the ordinary course of the contractor’s business, may provide for such terms and conditions as the district deems necessary to protect its interests including, but not limited to, progress payments as the work is performed, provided that at least 10 percent of the contract price is required to be withheld until final delivery and acceptance of the goods or services, and that the contractor is required to submit a performance bond of at least one-half the total payable under the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Recycled Product Procurement Mandates Pertaining to Local Governments [22150. - 22154.]

22150.

(a) If fitness and quality are equal, each local public entity shall purchase recycled products, as defined in Section 12200, instead of nonrecycled products whenever recycled products are available at the same or a lesser total cost than nonrecycled items.

(b) A local public entity may give preference to suppliers of recycled products.

(c) A local public entity may define the amount of this preference.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 590, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22151.

In bids in which the local government has reserved the right to make multiple awards, the recycled product preference cost shall be applied, to the extent possible, so as to maximize the dollar participation of firms offering recycled products in the contract award.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 590, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22152.

(a) All local public entities shall require all business, as defined in Section 12200, to certify in writing the minimum, if not exact, percentage of postconsumer materials in the products, materials, goods, or supplies, offered or sold. All contract provisions impeding the consideration of recycled products shall be deleted in favor of performance standards.

(b) With respect to printer or duplication cartridges that comply with the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 12156, the certification required by this subdivision shall specify that the cartridges so comply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 590, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22153.

All printing contracts made by any local public entity shall provide that the paper used shall meet the recycled content requirements of Section 12209.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 590, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22154.

(a) All businesses shall certify in writing to the contracting officer, or his or her representative, the minimum, if not exact, percentage of postconsumer material in the products, materials, goods, or supplies being offered or sold to any local public entity.

(b) With respect to printer or duplication cartridges that comply with the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 12156, the certification required by this section shall specify that the cartridges so comply.

(c) A local public entity may waive the certification requirement if the percentage of postconsumer material in the products, materials, goods, or supplies can be verified in a written advertisement, including, but not limited to, a product label, a catalog, or a manufacturer or vendor Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 198.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Local Agency Design-Build Projects [22160. - 22169.]

22160.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the design-build method of project delivery, using a best value procurement methodology, has been authorized for various agencies that have reported benefits from such projects including reduced project costs, expedited project completion, and design features that are not achievable through the traditional design-bid-build method.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the following occur:

(1) This chapter provides general authorization for local agencies to use design-build for projects, excluding projects on the state highway system.

(2) This chapter shall not be deemed to provide a preference for the design-build method over other procurement methodologies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 931, Sec. 14.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22161.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that relate to price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance. A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest cost proposal meeting the interests of the local agency and meeting the objectives of the project, selection of the best proposal for a stipulated sum established by the procuring agency, or a tradeoff between price and other specified factors.

(b) “Construction subcontract” means each subcontract awarded by the design-build entity to a subcontractor that will perform work or labor or render service to the design-build
 entity in or about the construction of the work or improvement, or a subcontractor licensed by the State of California that, under subcontract to the design-build entity, specially fabricates and installs a portion of the work or improvement according to detailed drawings contained in the plans and specifications produced by the design-build team.

(c) “Design-build” means a project delivery process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single entity.

(d) “Design-build entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, and engineering services as needed pursuant to a design-build contract.

(e) “Design-build team” means the design-build entity itself and
 the individuals and other entities identified by the design-build entity as members of its team. Members shall include the general contractor and, if utilized in the design of the project, all electrical, mechanical, and plumbing contractors.

(f) “Local agency” means the following:

(1) A city, county, or city and county.

(2) A special district that operates wastewater facilities, solid waste management facilities, water recycling facilities, or fire protection facilities.

(3) Any transit district, included transit district, municipal operator, included municipal operator, any consolidated agency, as described in Section 132353.1 of the Public Utilities Code, any joint powers
 authority, any county transportation commission created pursuant to Section 130050 of the Public Utilities Code, or any other local or regional agency, responsible for the construction of transit projects.

(4) The San Diego Association of Governments, as referenced in the San Diego Regional Transportation Consolidation Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 132350) of Division 12.7 of the Public Utilities Code).

(5) The Stanislaus Regional Water Authority.

(g) (1) Except as specified in subdivision (h), for a local agency defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), “project” means the construction of a building or buildings and improvements directly related to the construction of a building or buildings, county sanitation wastewater treatment
 facilities, and park and recreational facilities, but does not include the construction of other infrastructure, including, but not limited to, streets and highways, public rail transit, or water resources facilities and infrastructure. For a local agency defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) that operates wastewater facilities, solid waste management facilities, or water recycling facilities, “project” also means the construction of regional and local wastewater treatment facilities, regional and local solid waste facilities, or regional and local water recycling facilities.

(2) For a local agency defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), “project” means the construction of regional and local wastewater treatment facilities, regional and local solid waste facilities, regional and local water recycling facilities, or fire protection facilities.

(3) Except as specified in
 subdivision (h), for a local agency defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f), “project” means a transit capital project that begins a project solicitation on or after January 1, 2015. A “project,” as defined by this paragraph, that begins the solicitation process before January 1, 2015, is subject to Article 6.8 (commencing with Section 20209.5) of Chapter 1. “Project,” as defined by this paragraph, does not include state highway construction or local street and road projects.

(4) For a local agency defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f), “project” has the same meaning as in paragraph (3), and shall also include development projects adjacent, or physically or functionally related, to transit facilities developed or jointly developed by the local agency.

(5) For a local agency defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (f), “project” means the Stanislaus Regional Water
 Authority’s Regional Surface Water Supply Project.

(h) In recognition of the additional transportation funds made available by the Road Repair and Accountability Act of 2017 (Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2017), and to accelerate the delivery of transportation projects to the public, in addition to the authority provided in other subdivisions of this section, for a local agency defined in paragraph (1) or (3) of subdivision (f), for up to six projects to be selected by the Department of Transportation, a “project” also means construction or rehabilitation of local streets and roads, including, but not limited to, bridge replacement and railroad grade separations. Consistent with Provision 2 of Item 2660-110-0042 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2016, as amended by Chapter 7 of the Statutes of 2017, three projects shall be reserved for and selected by the Riverside County Transportation Commission, with the first priority for the projects
 listed in that budget item.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   (AB 400)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), and notwithstanding any other law, a local agency, with approval of its governing body, may procure design-build contracts for public works projects in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000), awarding the contract either the low bid or the best value, provided that this article shall not apply to any projects on the state highway system.

(b) When a local agency described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 22161 awards a contract for the acquisition and installation of technology applications or surveillance equipment designed to enhance safety, disaster preparedness, and homeland security efforts, there shall be no cost threshold and the
 contract may be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder or by using the best value method.

(c) The local agency shall develop guidelines for a standard organizational conflict-of-interest policy, consistent with applicable law, regarding the ability of a person or entity, that performs services for the local agency relating to the solicitation of a design-build project, to submit a proposal as a design-build entity, or to join a design-build team. This conflict-of-interest policy shall apply to each local agency entering into design-build contracts authorized under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 931, Sec. 14.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.4.

Upon approval of its governing body, a city, county, or city and county may use the design-build contracting process described in this chapter to award contracts for construction of projects that are necessary in order to comply with construction-related accessibility standards, as defined in Section 65946 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 900, Sec. 1.   (SB 1354)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.5.

Upon approval by its governing body, the Santa Clara Valley Water District may use the design-build contracting process described in this chapter to award a contract for the following projects:

(a) Flood protection improvements.

(b) Habitat restorations or enhancements.

(c) Groundwater recharge or storage facilities.

(d) Water treatment facilities.

(e) The retrofit, repair, or expansion of existing surface water storage facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 821, Sec. 4.   (AB 851)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.6.

(a) Upon approval of the board of supervisors, the County of Orange may use the design-build contracting process described in this chapter to award a contract for the following projects:

(1) Flood protection improvements.

(2) Harbor and beach improvements.

(3) Bikeway improvements.

(b) In addition to the requirements set forth in Section 22164, for a project authorized under subdivision (a), the county shall be responsible for the performance of, and county employees in Orange
 County Public Works may perform, project development services, including performance specifications, preliminary engineering, procurement services and the preparation of project reports, and construction inspection services, excluding specialty bridge inspectors. The county shall also be the responsible agency for, and county employees in Orange County Public Works may perform, the preparation of documents that may include, but need not be limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering quality of
 materials, equipment, and workmanship, preliminary plans, and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the needs of the County of Orange.

(c) For a project authorized under subdivision (a), the county shall be limited to no more than one project per year in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   (AB 2654)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.7.

(a) Upon approval of the governing body, the Orange County Flood Control District, as defined in Chapter 36 of the Orange County Flood Control Act, Sections 1 to 23 of the Orange County Flood Control Act, Water Code Appendix, may use the design-build contracting process described in this chapter to award a contract for flood protection improvements.

(b) In addition to the requirements set forth in Section 22164, for a project authorized under subdivision (a), the Orange County Flood Control District shall be responsible for the performance of, and county employees in Orange County Public Works
 may perform, project development services, including performance specifications, preliminary engineering, procurement services and the preparation of project reports, and construction inspection services, excluding specialty bridge inspectors. The county shall also be the responsible agency for, and county employees in Orange County Public Works may perform, the preparation of documents that may include, but need not be limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering quality of materials, equipment, and workmanship, preliminary plans, and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the needs of the Orange County
 Flood Control District.

(c) For a project authorized under subdivision (a), the district shall be limited to no more than twelve projects in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) prior to January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 239, Sec. 2.   (AB 2654)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.8.

(a) Upon approval of its governing body, the Paradise Irrigation District may use the design-build contracting process described in this chapter to award a contract for a water conveyance pipeline from the Town of Paradise to the City of Chico.

(b) Upon approval of a majority of the Paradise Town Council, the Town of Paradise may use the design-build contracting process described in this chapter to provide for the provision of sewer treatment to the Town of Paradise, including for infrastructure connecting the Town of Paradise to an existing treatment facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 689, Sec. 1.   (AB 36)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.9.

(a) Upon approval of the city council of the City of Long Beach, the City of Long Beach may use the design-build contracting process described in this chapter to award contracts for curb ramps that are compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act.

(b) In addition to the requirements set forth in Section 22164, for a project authorized under subdivision (a), the city and city employees in the City of Long Beach Public Works Department may perform project development services, including performance specifications, preliminary engineering, procurement services and the preparation of project reports, and construction inspection services, excluding specialty
 bridge inspections. The city shall also be the responsible agency for, and city employees in the Public Works Department may perform, the preparation of documents that may include, but need not be limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering quality of materials, equipment, and workmanship, preliminary plans, and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the needs of the city.

(c) For a project authorized under subdivision (a), the city shall be limited to no more than 3,000 ramps, with the total cost not to exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) per year,
 that are subject to completion prior to January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 54, Sec. 1.   (AB 2932)   Effective September 9, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22164.

The procurement process for the design-build projects shall progress as follows:

(a) (1) The local agency shall prepare a set of documents setting forth the scope and estimated price of the project. The documents may include, but need not be limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering the quality of materials, equipment, workmanship, preliminary plans or building layouts, or any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the local agency’s needs. The performance specifications and any plans shall be prepared by a design professional who is duly licensed and registered in California.

(2) The documents shall not include a design-build-operate contract for any project. The documents, however, may include operations during a training or transition period but shall not include long-term operations for any project.

(b) The local agency shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to prequalify or short-list the design-build entities whose proposals shall be evaluated for final selection. The request for qualifications shall include, but need not be limited to, the following elements:

(1) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the local agency to evaluate proposals, the procedure for final
 selection of the design-build entity, and any other information deemed necessary by the local agency to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the local agency reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design and construction expertise, acceptable safety record, and all other nonprice-related factors.

(3) A standard template request for statements of qualifications prepared by the local agency. In preparing the standard template, the local agency may consult with the construction industry, the building trades and surety industry, and other local agencies interested in using the authorization provided by this article. The template shall require the following information:

(A) If the design-build entity is a privately held corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or joint venture, a listing of all of the shareholders, partners, or members known at the time of statement of qualification submission who will perform work on the project.

(B) Evidence that the members of the design-build team have completed, or demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the design and construction of the project, and a financial statement that ensures that the design-build entity has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to design and construct the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the design-build entity has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and a worker safety program.

(F) If the proposed design-build entity is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity, a copy of the organizational documents or agreement committing to form the
 organization.

(G) An acceptable safety record. A proposer’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category or if the proposer is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(4) (A) The information required under this subdivision shall be certified under penalty of perjury by the design-build entity and its general partners or joint venture members.

(B) Information required under this subdivision that is not otherwise a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall not be open to public inspection.

(c) (1) A design-build entity shall not be prequalified or short-listed unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the local agency that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following
 requirements are met:

(A) The local agency has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the local agency prior to January 1, 2017.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.

(d) Based on the documents prepared as described in subdivision (a), the local agency shall prepare a request for proposals that invites prequalified or short-listed entities to submit competitive sealed proposals in the manner prescribed by the local agency. The request for proposals shall include, but need not be limited to, the following elements:

(1) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the estimated cost of the project, the methodology that will be used by the local agency to evaluate proposals, whether the contract will be awarded on the basis of low bid or best value, and any other
 information deemed necessary by the local agency to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the local agency reasonably expects to consider in evaluating proposals, including, but not limited to, cost or price and all nonprice-related factors.

(3) The relative importance or the weight assigned to each of the factors identified in the request for proposals.

(4) Where a best value selection method is used, the local agency may reserve the right to request proposal revisions and hold discussions and negotiations with responsive proposers, in which case the local agency shall so specify in the request for proposals and shall publish separately or incorporate into the request for proposals
 applicable procedures to be observed by the local agency to ensure that any discussions or negotiations are conducted in good faith.

(e) For those projects utilizing low bid as the final selection method, the competitive bidding process shall result in lump-sum bids by the prequalified or short-listed design-build entities, and awards shall be made to the design-build entity that is the lowest responsible bidder.

(f) For those projects utilizing best value as a selection method, the design-build competition shall progress as follows:

(1) Competitive proposals shall be evaluated by using only the criteria and selection procedures specifically identified in the request for proposals. The following minimum factors, however, shall
 be weighted as deemed appropriate by the local agency:

(A) Price, unless a stipulated sum is specified.

(B) Technical design and construction expertise.

(C) Life-cycle costs over 15 or more years.

(2) Pursuant to subdivision (d), the local agency may hold discussions or negotiations with responsive proposers using the process articulated in the local agency’s request for proposals.

(3) When the evaluation is complete, the responsive proposers shall be ranked based on a determination of value provided, provided that no more than three proposers are required to be ranked.

(4) The award of the contract shall be made to the responsible design-build entity whose proposal is determined by the local agency to have offered the best value to the public.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, upon issuance of a contract award, the local agency shall publicly announce its award, identifying the design-build entity to which the award is made, along with a statement regarding the basis of the award.

(6) The statement regarding the local agency’s contract award, described in paragraph (5), and the contract file shall provide sufficient information to satisfy an external audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 365.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22165.

(a) The design-build entity shall provide payment and performance bonds for the project in the form and in the amount required by the local agency, and issued by a California admitted surety. The amount of the payment bond shall not be less than the amount of the performance bond.

(b) The design-build contract shall require errors and omissions insurance coverage for the design elements of the project.

(c) The local agency shall develop a standard form of payment and performance bond for its design-build projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 931, Sec. 14.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22166.

(a) The local agency, in each design-build request for proposals, may identify specific types of subcontractors that must be included in the design-build entity statement of qualifications and proposal. All construction subcontractors that are identified in the proposal shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(b) Following award of the design-build contract, the design-build entity shall proceed as follows in awarding construction subcontracts with a value exceeding one-half of 1 percent of the contract price allocable to construction work:

(1) Provide public notice of availability of
 work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the local agency, including a fixed date and time on which qualifications statements, bids, or proposals will be due.

(2) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(3) Award the subcontract either on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder. The process may include prequalification or short-listing. The foregoing process does not apply to construction subcontractors listed in the original proposal. Subcontractors awarded construction subcontracts under this subdivision shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 931, Sec. 14.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22167.

(a) If the local agency elects to award a project pursuant to this article, retention proceeds withheld by the local agency from the design-build entity shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond, issued by an admitted surety insurer, is required in the solicitation of bids.

(b) In a contract between the design-build entity and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld may not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the local agency and the design-build entity. If the design-build entity provides written notice to any subcontractor that is not a member of the
 design-build entity, prior to or at the time the bid is requested, that a bond may be required and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the design-build entity, then the design-build entity may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the local agency and the design-build entity from any payment made by the design-build entity to the subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 931, Sec. 14.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22168.

Nothing in this article affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 931, Sec. 14.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22169.)
-------------------------------------------

22169.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 201, Sec. 2.   (AB 400)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 4, commencing with Section 22160.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.1. Local Agency Progressive Design-Build Contracting [22170. - 22174.]

22170.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) (1) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that may include, but are not limited to, price, features, function, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance.

(2) A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest cost proposal meeting the interests of the local agency and the objectives of the project.

(b) “Construction subcontract” means each subcontract awarded by the design-build entity to a subcontractor that will
 perform work or labor or render service to the design-build entity in or about the construction of the work or improvement, or a subcontractor licensed by the State of California that, under subcontract to the design-build entity, specially fabricates and installs a portion of the work or improvement according to detailed drawings contained in the plans and specifications produced by the design-build team.

(c) “Design-build entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, and engineering services as needed pursuant to a design-build contract.

(d) “Design-build project” means any project that treats, pumps, stores, or conveys water, wastewater,